Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-415
Board; secretary; duties.

The secretary of the board shall keep the minutes of the board and shall perform such other services as may be required by him of the board, and may receive such compensation as may be fixed by the board from time to time.

Laws 1941, c. 148, § 6, p. 586;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 72-416;

R.S.1943, § 72-415.